en: Free Weights
xx: Free Weights
cs: Činky
da: Håndvægte
de: Hanteln
es: Peso libre
fr: Poids libres
it: Pesi liberi
ja: フリーウエイト
nl: Losse gewichten
no: Frivekter
pl: Wolne ciężary
pt: Pesos livres
ru: Тренажеры со свободным отягощением
sv: Fria vikter
tr: Serbest Ağırlıklar

en: Weight Lifting Belts
xx: Weight Lifting Belts
cs: Vzpěračské pásy
da: Vægtløftningsbælter
de: Gewichthebergürtel
es: Cinturones para levantar pesas
fr: Ceintures d'haltérophilie
it: Cinture per sollevamento pesi
ja: ウェイトリフティング用ベルト
nl: Gewichthefriemen
no: Belter til vektløfting
pl: Pasy kulturystyczne
pt: Cintos para levantamento de peso
ru: Пояса для тяжелой атлетики
sv: Träningsbälten
tr: Halter Kemerleri

en: Weight Lifting Gloves & Hand Supports
xx: Weight Lifting Gloves & Hand Supports
cs: Vzpěračské rukavice
da: Handsker og håndstøtter til vægtløftning
de: Gewichtheberhandschuhe & Handgelenkschoner
es: Guantes y soportes de mano para levantar pesas
fr: Gants d'haltérophilie et accessoires pour les mains
it: Guanti e polsiere per sollevamento pesi
ja: ウェイトリフティング用グローブ
nl: Handschoenen en -steunen voor gewichtheffen
no: Hansker og håndleddstøtte for vektløfting
pl: Rękawice i uchwyty do podnoszenia ciężarów
pt: Luvas de levantamento de peso
ru: Перчатки и эластичные бинты для тяжелой атлетики
sv: Träningshandskar och handstöd
tr: Ağırlık Kaldırma Eldivenleri ve El Destekleri

en: Weight Lifting Machine & Exercise Bench Accessories
xx: Weight Lifting Machine & Exercise Bench Accessories
cs: Příslušenství ke vzpěracím trenažérům a lavicím
da: Vægtløftningsmaskiner – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Krafttrainingsgeräte
es: Accesorios para máquinas de levantamiento de pesas y bancos de ejercicio
fr: Accessoires pour machines et bancs d'haltérophilie
it: Accessori per panche e macchine per sollevamento pesi
ja: ウェイトリフティングマシン関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor krachtapparatuur en fitnessbanken
no: Tilbehør til multigym og treningsbenker
pl: Akcesoria do atlasów i ławek treningowych
pt: Acessórios para aparelhos para levantamento de peso
ru: Принадлежности для силовых тренажеров и тренировочных скамей
sv: Tillbehör till styrketräningsmaskiner och -bänkar
tr: Ağırlık Kaldırma Makinesi ve Egzersiz Sehpası Aksesuarları

en: Weight Lifting Machines & Racks
xx: Weight Lifting Machines & Racks
cs: Vzpěrací trenažéry a posilovací stojany
da: Vægtløftningsmaskiner
de: Krafttrainingsgeräte
es: Máquinas de levantamiento de pesas
fr: Machines d'haltérophilie et supports pour barres
it: Macchine e rastrelliere per sollevamento pesi
ja: ウェイトリフティングマシン
nl: Krachtapparatuur en -rekken
no: Multigym og vektløftingsstativer
pl: Atlasy treningowe i stelaże na ciężary
pt: Aparelhos e suportes para levantamento de peso
ru: Силовые тренажеры и стойки
sv: Maskiner och ställningar för styrketräning
tr: Ağırlık Kaldırma Makineleri

en: Weighted Clothing
xx: Weighted Clothing
cs: Zátěžové oblečení
da: Vægtet tøj
de: Gewichtswesten & -manschetten
es: Ropa con peso
fr: Vêtements alourdis
it: Indumenti pesanti per allenamento
ja: ウェイト付きウェア
nl: Verzwaarde kleding
no: Klær med vekter
pl: Obciążniki
pt: Roupas com peso
ru: Утяжеленная одежда
sv: Kläder med vikter
tr: Ağırlık Kıyafetleri

en: Yoga & Pilates
xx: Yoga & Pilates
cs: Jóga a pilates
da: Yoga og pilates
de: Yoga & Pilates
es: Yoga y pilates
fr: Pilates et yoga
it: Yoga e pilates
ja: ヨガ・ピラティス
nl: Yoga en pilates
no: Yoga og pilates
pl: Joga i pilates
pt: Yoga e Pilates
ru: Товары для йоги и пилатеса
sv: Yoga och pilates
tr: Yoga ve Pilates

en: Pilates Machines
xx: Pilates Machines
cs: Trenažéry na pilates
da: Pilatesmaskiner
de: Pilates-Geräte
es: Máquinas de pilates
fr: Machines pilates
it: Macchine pilates
ja: ピラティスマシン
nl: Pilatesapparaten
no: Pilates-maskiner
pl: Sprzęt do pilatesu
pt: Aparelhos para pilates
ru: Тренажеры для пилатеса
sv: Pilatesmaskiner
tr: Pilates Makineleri

en: Yoga & Pilates Blocks
xx: Yoga & Pilates Blocks
cs: Cihličky na jógu a pilates
da: Yoga- og pilatesblokke
de: Yoga- & Pilatesblöcke
es: Bloques para yoga y pilates
fr: Blocs de yoga et Pilates
it: Blocchi per yoga e pilates
ja: ヨガブロック
nl: Yoga- en pilatesblokken
no: Yoga- og pilates-blokker
pl: Klocki do jogi i pilatesu
pt: Blocos de yoga e pilates
ru: Блоки для йоги и пилатеса
sv: Block för yoga och pilates
tr: Yoga ve Pilates Blokları

en: Yoga & Pilates Mats
xx: Yoga & Pilates Mats
cs: Cvičební podložky na jógu a pilates
da: Yoga- og pilatesmåtter
de: Yoga- & Pilatesmatten
es: Esteras para pilates y yoga
fr: Tapis pilates et yoga
it: Tappetini yoga e pilates
ja: ヨガマット・ピラティスマット
nl: Yoga- en pilatesmatten
no: Yoga- og pilates-matter
pl: Maty do jogi i pilatesu
pt: Tapetes de yoga e pilates
ru: Коврики для йоги и пилатеса
sv: Yoga- och pilatesmattor
tr: Yoga ve Pilates Matları

en: Yoga & Pilates Towels
xx: Yoga & Pilates Towels
cs: Ručníky na jógu a pilates
da: Yoga- og pilatestæpper
de: Yoga- & Pilatestücher
es: Toallas para yoga y pilates
fr: Serviettes de yoga et Pilates
it: Teli per yoga e pilates
ja: ヨガ・ピラティス用タオル
nl: Yoga- en pilateshanddoeken
no: Håndklær til yoga og pilates
pl: Ręczniki do jogi i pilatesu
pt: Toalhas de yoga e pilates
ru: Полотенца для йоги и пилатеса
sv: Handdukar för yoga och pilates
tr: Yoga ve Pilates Havluları

en: Yoga Mat Bags & Straps
xx: Yoga Mat Bags & Straps
cs: Tašky na podložky na jógu
da: Tasker til yogamåtter
de: Beutel für Yogamatten
es: Bolsas para esterillas de yoga
fr: Sacs pour matelas de yoga
it: Borse per tappetini yoga
ja: ヨガマットケース
nl: Tassen voor yogamatten
no: Sekker til yogamatter
pl: Pokrowce na maty do jogi
pt: Sacolas para tapete de ioga
ru: Сумки для ковриков для занятий йогой
sv: Yogamattpåsar
tr: Yoga Mat Çantaları

en: Indoor Games
xx: Indoor Games
cs: Indoorové aktivity
da: Indendørsspil
de: Indoor - Aktivitäten
es: Juegos de interior
fr: Jeux d'intérieur
it: Giochi indoor
ja: 室内競技・室内ゲーム
nl: Binnenspelletjes
no: Innendørsspill
pl: Gry towarzyskie
pt: Jogos internos
ru: Зальные игры
sv: Inomhussporter
tr: İç Mekan Sporları

en: Air Hockey
xx: Air Hockey
cs: Stolní hokej
da: Airhockey
de: Air-Hockey
es: Hockey de mesa
fr: Air Hockey
it: Air hockey
ja: エアホッケー用品
nl: Air hockey
no: Lufthockey
pl: Air hockey
pt: Hóquei aéreo
ru: Аэрохоккей
sv: Air hockey
tr: Hava Hokeyi

en: Air Hockey Equipment
xx: Air Hockey Equipment
cs: Vybavení na stolní hokej
da: Udstyr til airhockey
de: Air-Hockey-Ausrüstung
es: Equipamiento para hockey de mesa
fr: Équipement de air hockey
it: Attrezzature per air hockey
ja: エアホッケー用具
nl: Air hockey-benodigdheden
no: Lufthockeyutstyr
pl: Sprzęt do air hockey'a
pt: Equipamento de hóquei aéreo
ru: Снаряжение для игры в аэрохоккей
sv: Lufthockeyutrustning
tr: Hava Hokeyi Ekipmanları

en: Air Hockey Table Parts
xx: Air Hockey Table Parts
cs: Díly stolů na stolní hokej
da: Airhockeyborde – dele
de: Air-Hockey-Tischzubehör
es: Piezas para mesas de hockey
fr: Pièces de table de hockey
it: Parti tavolo air hockey
ja: エアホッケー台パーツ
nl: Onderdelen voor Air hockey-tafels
no: Deler til lufthockeybord
pl: Części stołu do gry w air hockey
pt: Peças de mesa de hóquei aéreo
ru: Детали столов для аэрохоккея
sv: Delar till air hockey-bord
tr: Hava Hokeyi Masa Parçaları

en: Air Hockey Tables
xx: Air Hockey Tables
cs: Stoly na stolní hokej
da: Airhockeyborde
de: Air-Hockey-Tische
es: Mesas de hockey
fr: Tables de Air hockey
it: Tavoli air hockey
ja: エアホッケー台
nl: Air hockey-tafels
no: Lufthockeybord
pl: Stoły do gry w air hockey
pt: Mesas de hóquei aéreo
ru: Столы для аэрохоккея
sv: Air hockey-bord
tr: Hava Hokeyi Masaları

en: Billiards
xx: Billiards
cs: Kulečník
da: Billard
de: Billard
es: Billar
fr: Billard
it: Biliardi
ja: ビリヤード用品
nl: Biljart
no: Biljard
pl: Bilard
pt: Bilhar
ru: Бильярд
sv: Biljard
tr: Bilardo

en: Billiard Ball Racks
xx: Billiard Ball Racks
cs: Ohrádky na koule
da: Pooltrekante
de: Billarddreiecke
es: Triángulos para bolas de billar
fr: Racks pour boules de billard
it: Triangoli per biliardo
ja: ビリヤードボール用ラック
nl: Biljartbalracks
no: Biljardkulestativer
pl: Trójkąty do ustawiania bil
pt: Triângulos para bolas de bilhar
ru: Полки для бильярдных шаров
sv: Biljardbollstrianglar
tr: Amerikan Bilardo Üçgenleri

en: Billiard Balls
xx: Billiard Balls
cs: Kulečníkové koule
da: Billardballer
de: Billardkugeln
es: Bolas de billar
fr: Boules de billard, Boule de billard
it: Palle da biliardo
ja: ビリヤードボール
nl: Biljartballen
no: Biljardkuler
pl: Bile do gry w bilarda
pt: Bolas de bilhar
ru: Бильярдные шары
sv: Biljardbollar
tr: Bilardo Topları